Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5049.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1179a. (1) Beginning with the 2014-2015 school year, a school The board of a school district shall ensure that, in each school it operates with an not fewer than 10 instructional and administrative staff, of at least 10, there are at least 2 employees at the school who have been trained in the appropriate use and administration of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system and that, in each school it the board operates with an fewer than 10 instructional and administrative staff, of fewer than 10, there is at least 1 employee at the school who has been trained in the appropriate use and administration of an epinephrine auto-injector. delivery system. The training required under this subsection shall must be conducted under the supervision of, and shall must include evaluation by, a licensed registered professional nurse. (2) Not later than the beginning of the 2014-2015 school year, a school the board of a school district shall develop and implement policies that are consistent with the department's medication administration guidelines, as revised under subsection (4), and that provide for the possession of at least 2 epinephrine auto-injectors delivery systems in each school operated by the school board to be used for administration by a licensed registered professional nurse who is employed or contracted by the school district or by a school employee who is trained in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system under subsection (1) and is authorized to administer an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system under the policies. The policies shall must authorize a licensed registered professional nurse who is employed or contracted by the school district or a school employee who is trained in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system under subsection (1) to administer an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system to a pupil who has a prescription on file at the school. The policies also shall must authorize a licensed registered professional nurse who is employed or contracted by the school district or a school employee who is trained in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system under subsection (1) to administer an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system to any other individual on school grounds who is believed to be having an anaphylactic reaction. The policies also shall must require notification to the parent or legal guardian of a pupil to whom an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system has been administered. (3) A licensed registered professional nurse who is employed or contracted by the school district or a school employee who is trained in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system under subsection (1) may possess and administer an epinephrine auto-injector.delivery system. (4) The department, in conjunction with the department of community health and human services and with input from the Michigan association Association of school nurses, School Nurses, the Michigan nurses association, Nurses Association, the Michigan parent teacher association, Parent Teacher Association, the American college College of allergy, asthma, Allergy, Asthma, and immunology, Immunology, the Michigan chapter of the American academy Academy of pediatrics, Pediatrics, the school-community health alliance School-Community Health Alliance of Michigan, and other school health organizations and entities, shall identify, develop, and adopt appropriate revisions to the medication administration guidelines issued by the department, including, but not limited to, those relating to the specification of training needs and requirements for the administration and maintenance of stock epinephrine auto-injectors, delivery systems, including stocking of both junior and regular dose epinephrine auto-injectors, delivery systems, as necessary, and storage requirements. (5) At least annually, a school district shall report to the department, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, all instances of administration of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system to a pupil at school. The reporting shall must include at least all of the following: (a) The number of instances of administration of an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system to a pupil at school in a school year. (b) The number of pupils who were administered an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system at school who were not previously known to be severely allergic. (c) The number of pupils who were administered an epinephrine auto-injector delivery system at school using the school's stock of epinephrine auto-injectors.delivery systems. (6) A school board shall attempt to obtain funding or resources from private sources, or from another source other than this state, for fulfilling the requirements of this section. If a school board is unable to obtain this alternative funding for all or part of its costs of complying with this section, the school board may apply to the department for reimbursement for the unfunded costs of complying with this section, in the form and manner prescribed by the department. The legislature shall appropriate funds for making this reimbursement. The department shall make the reimbursement according to the appropriation that is made for this purpose. The department annually shall submit a report to the legislature detailing the number of school boards that apply for reimbursement and the number of school boards that are able to secure alternative funding. (7) As used in this section, "epinephrine delivery system" means that term as defined in section 17744a of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17744a. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5054 (request no. H02192'25). (b) House Bill No. 5050 (request no. H02479'25). (c) House Bill No. 5051 (request no. H02911'25). (d) House Bill No. 5052 (request no. H03174'25). (e) House Bill No. 5053 (request no. H03176'25).